Utah statutes.
63G-7-502.   Venue of actions.

(1)  Actions against the state may be brought in the county in which the claim arose or in Salt Lake County.

(2) (a)  Actions against a county may be brought in the county in which the claim arose, or in the defendant county, or, upon leave granted by a district court judge of the defendant county, in any county contiguous to the defendant county.

(b)  Leave may be granted ex parte.

(3)  Actions against all other political subdivisions, including cities and towns, shall be brought in the county in which the political subdivision is located or in the county in which the claim arose.

